District of Columbia statutes.
38-2672

State Athletic Activities, Programs, and Office Fund established.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the State Athletic Activities, Programs, and Office Fund (“Fund”), which shall be used solely as provided in subsection (b) of this section, and which shall be administered by the State Superintendent of Education. The State Superintendent of Education may designate or assign the authority to administer the Fund to an entity within the Office of the State Superintendent of Education, including the SAO.

(b)

(1)

The Fund shall be used to enhance the development of state interscholastic athletic programs and competitions and to supplement the operations budget of the DCSAA. The Statewide Director of Athletics shall prioritize resources from the Fund to ensure well-designed and effective interscholastic athletic programs and competitions.

(2)

The Fund may be used for the financial support of state athletic programs and competitions that are well-designed and effective and comply with National Federation of State High School Associations standards and District laws and regulations, including for:

(A)

Championship events;

(B)

Equipment;

(C)

Memorabilia;

(D)

Training;

(E)

Security;

(F)

Awards; and

(G)

Related operations.

(c)

The Fund shall consist of the revenue from the following sources:

(1)

Annual appropriations;

(2)

Any proceeds resulting from athletic programs and activities organized or directed by the SAO or DCSAA, or both, including:

(A)

Sponsorships or advertisements;

(B)

Ticket or merchandise sales;

(C)

Fundraising activities;

(D)

Competitions; or

(E)

Other athletic programs and activities; and

(3)

Interest earned on funds deposited into the Fund.

(d)

(1)

The money deposited into the Fund shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

(2)

Subject to authorization by Congress, any funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 4033, 60 DCR 12472
This section is referenced in § 38-2671.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 4033 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 4033 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 4031 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle C of Title IV of the act may be cited as the “State Athletic Activities, Programs, and Office Fund Act of 2013”.